Alaska statutes. Title 3. Agriculture, Animals, and Food.
Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1983 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to § 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982 and in 1983, 1996, 2008, 2010, and 2014 to make other, minor editorial changes. Minor changes were also made in AS 03.05 and AS 03.25 in 1981.

Administrative Code. —

For agriculture, see 11 AAC, part 4.

For Alaska food code, see 18 AAC 31.

For milk, milk products, and reindeer slaughtering and processing, see 18 AAC 32.

For animal health, see 18 AAC 36.

Collateral references. —

Neil E. Harl, Agricultural Law (Matthew Bender).